Hawaii statutes.
§167-11 Rate policy; sale of excess water.
The board of agriculture shall have the power to fix and adjust rates and
charges for the furnishing of irrigation or domestic water and for water
service so that the revenues derived therefrom shall be sufficient to cover the
cost of operation, maintenance, replacement, and debt service on revenue bonds
in compliance with part III of chapter 39, and may make charges as may be
necessary to cover the capital cost of the system or other costs incurred in
connection with the system.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to
prevent the board from selling water to persons other than land occupiers and
other consumers within a water project in the event and to the extent that
water in excess of the needs of the land occupiers and other consumers may from
time to time be available. [L 1987, c 306, pt of §1; am L 1995, c 139, §3]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next